New York, session 2025-2026, A9493.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (g) of subdivision 2 of section 380.50 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amend- 3 ing the criminal procedure law relating to notifying certain crime 4 victims of the disposition of criminal trial, as proposed in legislative 5 bills numbers S. 7546 and A. 6332-A, is amended to read as follows: 6 (g) Following the acquittal after trial or the sentencing of any 7 defendant for a felony, the district attorney, or their designee, shall 8 [mail] provide a written summary of the disposition of such felony to 9 any victim who was not present at the time such defendant was sentenced 10 or acquitted after trial. Such written summary shall be provided by 11 mail, electronically, or by any other reasonable and secure means of 12 written communication. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 14 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the criminal procedure 15 law relating to notifying certain crime victims of the disposition of 16 criminal trial, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 7546 and A. 17 6332-A, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09461-04-6